Louisiana, session 2026, SB1.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:14(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§14. Meetings of public bodies to be open to the public
* * *
C. All votes made by members of a public body shall be viva voce and shall
be recorded in the minutes, journal, or other official, written proceedings of the body,
which shall be a public document. Any vote by an individual member of a public
body that is displayed and recorded using electronic machines shall satisfy the
concept of viva voce voting requirements of the Open Meetings Law.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be applied retroactively.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.